District of Columbia statutes.
26-1025

Consent to jurisdiction.

Any licensee, authorized delegate, or other person who knowingly engages in business activities that are regulated under this chapter, with or without filing an application, is deemed to have consented to the jurisdiction of the courts of the District of Columbia for all actions arising under this chapter.

July 18, 2000, D.C. Law 13-140, § 26, 47 DCR 3431